Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 805.105 is amended to read:
805.105. (1) The  Department of Transportation shall establish a veterans’ recognition registra-
tion plate program to issue registration plates called “veterans’ recognition registration  plates”
upon request to an owner of any motor vehicle registered under ORS 803.420 (6)(a)  or (c)  if  the
owner of the motor vehicle qualifies for the plates. Rules adopted under this section shall  include,
but need not be limited to, rules that:
(a) Describe general qualifications to be met by any veterans’ group in order  to be eligible for
a veterans’ recognition registration plate issued under this section.
(b) Specify circumstances under which the department may cease to issue veterans’  recognition
registration  plates.
(c) Specify what constitutes proof of veteran status for  issuance of a veterans’ recognition reg-
istration plate, if such proof is required by a  veterans’ group or by the Director of Veterans’ Affairs.
(d) Specify what constitutes proof that a person is a surviving family member of a person who
was killed in action during  an armed conflict while serving in the Armed Forces of the United
States. The department may only issue a veterans’  recognition registration plate displaying a gold
star decal and the words “Gold Star Family” to a person who is a parent, sibling, spouse  or de-
pendent of a person who was killed in  action during an armed conflict while serving in the Armed
Forces of the United States.
(2)(a) In addition to any other fee authorized by  law, upon issuance of a veterans’ recognition
registration plate under this section  and upon renewal of registration for a vehicle that has plates
issued under this section, the department shall collect  a surcharge of $2.50 per plate for each year
of the registration period for the vehicle as described under ORS 803.415.
(b) Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (c) of  this subsection, net proceeds of the sur-
charge collected by the department for the veterans’  recognition registration plate shall be depos-
ited in the trust fund established under ORS 406.050 for paying the expenses of operating the Oregon
Veterans’ Homes identified in ORS 408.362.
(c) If the department issues a veterans’ recognition registration plate  that names, describes or
represents a veterans’ group, that veterans’ group may designate an account  into which the net
proceeds of the surcharge collected by the department under this section are to  be deposited. The
department shall keep accurate records  of the number of plates issued under this paragraph for each
veterans’ group and, after payment  of administrative expenses of the department, shall deposit
moneys collected under this subsection into the specified account.
Enrolled Senate Bill 159 (SB 159-INTRO) Page 1
(d) The department shall waive the surcharge required under paragraph (a) of  this subsection
and transfer the amount otherwise paid by the person to the  trust fund established under ORS
406.050 if:
(A) A request to waive the surcharge is submitted by a Gold Star Family member; and
(B) Funds are appropriated by the  Legislative Assembly or otherwise made available to the de-
partment for the purpose of paying the surcharge.
(e) Deposits under this subsection shall be made quarterly.
(3)(a) In consultation with the Department of Transportation, the Director of Veterans’  Affairs
shall design the veterans’ recognition registration plate.
(b) If the department issues a veterans’ recognition registration plate  to recognize a veterans’
group, the department shall, in consultation with the requesting veterans’ group, add words or a
military-related decal to the veterans’ recognition registration plate that names, describes or  re-
presents the veterans’ group.
(c) The department shall add a gold star  decal and the words “Gold Star Family” to a veterans’
recognition registration plate background to recognize surviving family members of persons  killed
in action during an armed conflict while serving in the Armed Forces of the United States.
(d) Except as otherwise required by  the design, veterans’ recognition registration plates must
comply with the requirements of ORS 803.535.
(4) The department  shall determine how many sets of veterans’ recognition registration plates
will be manufactured. If the department does not sell or issue renewal for  500 sets of veterans’ re-
cognition registration plates in any one year, the department shall cease  production of veterans’
recognition registration plates. For the purposes of this section, veterans’ recognition registration
plates that  name, describe or represent a veterans’ group are included in the total number of
veterans’ recognition registration plates issued.
(5) For the purposes of this section, “sibling” includes siblings of the whole  or half blood and
siblings by adoption, marriage or domestic partnership.
Passed by Senate April 10, 2025
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House May 19, 2025
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 159 (SB 159-INTRO) Page 2